Final source/morphy/foma/conjunction.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL +LOC +UN
LEXICON Root
ConjunctionsStem;

LEXICON ConjunctionsStem

ද	conjunctions;
හා	conjunctions;
සහ	conjunctions;
හෝ	conjunctions;
එහෙත්	conjunctions;
සමඟ	conjunctions;
නමුත්	conjunctions;
සමග	conjunctions;
යැයි	conjunctions;
හරි	conjunctions;
ඒත්	conjunctions;
එක්ක	conjunctions;
දැයි	conjunctions;
නැත්නම්	conjunctions;
ඇතත්	conjunctions;
නැතහොත්	conjunctions;
නැතැයි	conjunctions;
නැතිනම්	conjunctions;
නොහොත්	conjunctions;
එහෙනම්	conjunctions;
නමුදු	conjunctions;
හැබැයි	conjunctions;
අතරම	conjunctions;
ලදැයි	conjunctions;
නැතත්	conjunctions;
කැටුව	conjunctions;
එක්කෝ	conjunctions;
එනමුත්	conjunctions;
නැතොත් conjunctions;



LEXICON conjunctions

+N+RT: #;
